Connecticut, session 2026, SB00228.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (k) of section 30-22a of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(k) For purposes of compliance with this section, "cafe" includes a
tobacco bar that: (1) During the calendar year ending December 31, 2002,
generated at least ten per cent of the tobacco bar's total annual gross
income from on-site sales of tobacco products and rentals of on-site
humidors; or (2) commenced operations during the period beginning
January 1, 2003, and ending December 31, [2022] 2025, and (A) generates
at least sixty per cent of the tobacco bar's total annual gross sales from
on-site sales of tobacco products, as defined in subparagraph (E) of
subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 19a-342, as amended by this
act, and subparagraph (F) of subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section
19a-342a, as amended by this act, as determined in an annual audit
conducted by an independent certified public accountant, (B) is located
in a municipality that has a population of at least [eighty] forty thousand
and does not contain another tobacco bar, (C) does not allow cigarettes
or cigarette tobacco on the premises, (D) contains a walk-in or stand-up
humidor as a built-in feature on the premises, (E) is located in a building
LCO 1 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 228
(i) in which no other owner-occupant, lessee or tenant has a right to
utilize the same space as the tobacco bar, or (ii) that uses the tobacco
bar's own heating, ventilation or air conditioning system to prevent
commingling of air, (F) is located in premises equipped with a
ventilation system that (i) provides local mechanical exhaust with no
recirculation, (ii) circulates at least sixty cubic feet of outdoor air per
person per minute to provide adequate indoor air quality, and (iii)
satisfies the requirements established in ANSI/ASHRAE 62-2001,
"ventilation for acceptable indoor air quality", as amended from time to
time, and (G) provides health coverage to the tobacco bar's employees
and their dependents in accordance with other applicable law,
including, but not limited to, the Patient Protection and Affordable Care
Act, P.L. 111-148, as amended by the Health Care and Education
Reconciliation Act, P.L. 111-152, as both may be amended from time to
time, and regulations adopted thereunder.
Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 19a-342 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 31-40q, no person
shall smoke: (A) In any area of a building or portion of a building,
owned and operated or leased and operated by the state or any political
subdivision of the state; (B) in any area of a health care institution,
including, but not limited to, a psychiatric facility; (C) in any area of a
retail establishment accessed by the general public; (D) in any
restaurant; (E) in any area of an establishment with a permit issued for
the sale of alcoholic liquor pursuant to section 30-20a, 30-21, 30-21b, 30-
22, 30-22c, 30-22g, 30-28, 30-28a, 30-33a, 30-33b, 30-35a, 30-37a, 30-37e or
30-37f, in any area of an establishment with a permit for the sale of
alcoholic liquor pursuant to section 30-22aa issued after May 1, 2003,
and, on and after April 1, 2004, in any area of an establishment with a
permit issued for the sale of alcoholic liquor pursuant to section 30-22a,
as amended by this act, or 30-26; (F) in any area of a school building or
on the grounds of such school; (G) within a child care facility or on the
grounds of such child care facility, except, if the child care facility is a
LCO 2 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 228
family child care home, as defined in section 19a-77, such smoking is
prohibited only when a child enrolled in such home is present during
customary business hours; (H) in any passenger elevator; (I) in any area
of a dormitory in any public or private institution of higher education;
(J) in any area of a facility equipped with screens for the simulcasting of
off-track betting race programs or jai alai games; (K) in any room offered
as an accommodation to guests by the operator of a hotel, motel or
similar lodging; (L) in any area of a correctional facility or halfway
house; or (M) in any area of a platform or a shelter at a rail, busway or
bus station, owned and operated or leased and operated by the state or
any political subdivision of the state. For purposes of this subsection,
"restaurant" means space, in a suitable and permanent building, kept,
used, maintained, advertised and held out to the public to be a place
where meals are regularly served to the public, "school" has the same
meaning as provided in section 10-154a and "child care facility" has the
same meaning as provided in section 19a-342a, as amended by this act.
(2) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply to the following:
(A) Public housing projects, as defined in subsection (b) of section 21a-
278a; (B) any classroom where demonstration smoking is taking place
as part of a medical or scientific experiment or lesson; (C)
notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1)
of this subsection, the outdoor portion of the premises of any permittee
listed in subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1) of this subsection,
provided, in the case of any seating area maintained for the service of
food, at least seventy-five per cent of the outdoor seating capacity is an
area in which smoking is prohibited and which is clearly designated
with written signage as a nonsmoking area, except that any temporary
seating area established for special events and not used on a regular
basis shall not be subject to the smoking prohibition or signage
requirements of this subparagraph; (D) any medical research site where
smoking is integral to the research being conducted; or (E) any tobacco
bar. For purposes of this subdivision, "outdoor" means an area which
has no roof or other ceiling enclosure; "tobacco bar" means an
establishment with a permit for the sale of alcoholic liquor to consumers
LCO 3 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 228
issued pursuant to section 30-22a, as amended by this act, that, in the
calendar year ending December 31, 2002, generated ten per cent or more
of its total annual gross income from the on-site sale of tobacco products
and the rental of on-site humidors or, for any tobacco bar that
commenced operations during the period beginning January 1, 2003,
and ending December 31, [2022] 2025, generates at least sixty per cent of
the tobacco bar's total annual gross sales from on-site sales of tobacco
products, as determined in an annual audit conducted by an
independent certified public accountant; and "tobacco product" means
cigars and pipe tobacco, and does not include cannabis, cigarettes or
chewing tobacco.
Sec. 3. Subsection (b) of section 19a-342a of the general statutes is
100 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
101 1, 2026):
102 (b) (1) No person shall use an electronic nicotine or cannabis delivery
103 system or vapor product: (A) In any area of a building or portion of a
104 building owned and operated or leased and operated by the state or any
105 political subdivision of the state; (B) in any area of a health care
106 institution, including, but not limited to, a psychiatric facility; (C) in any
107 area of a retail establishment accessed by the public; (D) in any
108 restaurant; (E) in any area of an establishment with a permit issued for
109 the sale of alcoholic liquor pursuant to section 30-20a, 30-21, 30-21b, 30-
110 22, 30-22a, as amended by this act, 30-22c, 30-22g, 30-26, 30-28, 30-28a,
111 30-33a, 30-33b, 30-35a, 30-37a, 30-37e or 30-37f, in any area of
112 establishment with a permit issued for the sale of alcoholic liquor
113 pursuant to section 30-22aa issued after May 1, 2003; (F) in any area of a
114 school building or on the grounds of such school; (G) within a child care
115 facility or on the grounds of such child care facility, except, if the child
116 care facility is a family child care home as defined in section 19a-77, such
117 use is prohibited only when a child enrolled in such home is present
118 during customary business hours; (H) in any passenger elevator; (I) in
119 any area of a dormitory in any public or private institution of higher
120 education; (J) in any area of a facility equipped with screens for the
121 simulcasting of off-track betting race programs or jai alai games; (K) in
LCO 4 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 228
122 any room offered as an accommodation to guests by the operator of a
123 hotel, motel or similar lodging; (L) in any area of a correctional facility,
124 halfway house or residential facility funded by the Judicial Branch; or
125 (M) in any area of a platform or a shelter at a rail, busway or bus station,
126 owned and operated or leased and operated by the state or any political
127 subdivision of the state. For purposes of this subsection, "restaurant"
128 means space, in a suitable and permanent building, kept, used,
129 maintained, advertised and held out to the public to be a place where
130 meals are regularly served to the public; and "school" has the same
131 meaning as provided in section 10-154a.
132 (2) Subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not apply to the following:
133 (A) Public housing projects, as defined in subsection (b) of section 21a-
134 278a; (B) any classroom where a demonstration of the use of an
135 electronic nicotine or cannabis delivery system or vapor product is
136 taking place as part of a medical or scientific experiment or lesson; (C)
137 any medical research site where the use of an electronic nicotine or
138 cannabis delivery system or vapor product is integral to the research
139 being conducted; (D) establishments without a permit for the sale of
140 alcoholic liquor that sell electronic nicotine delivery systems, vapor
141 products or liquid nicotine containers on-site and allow their customers
142 to use such systems, products or containers on-site; (E) notwithstanding
143 the provisions of subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1) of this subsection,
144 the outdoor portion of the premises of any permittee listed in
145 subparagraph (E) of subdivision (1) of this subsection, provided, in the
146 case of any seating area maintained for the service of food, at least
147 seventy-five per cent of the outdoor seating capacity is an area in which
148 smoking is prohibited and which is clearly designated with written
149 signage as a nonsmoking area, except that any temporary seating area
150 established for special events and not used on a regular basis shall not
151 be subject to the prohibition on the use of an electronic nicotine or
152 cannabis delivery system or vapor product or the signage requirements
153 of this subparagraph; or (F) any tobacco bar. For purposes of this
154 subdivision, "outdoor" means an area which has no roof or other ceiling
155 enclosure; "tobacco bar" means an establishment with a permit for the
LCO 5 of 6

Substitute Bill No. 228
156 sale of alcoholic liquor to consumers issued pursuant to section 30-22a,
157 as amended by this act, that, in the calendar year ending December 31,
158 2002, generated ten per cent or more of its total annual gross income
159 from the on-site sale of tobacco products and the rental of on-site
160 humidors or, for any tobacco bar that commenced operations during the
161 period beginning January 1, 2003, and ending December 31, [2022] 2025,
162 generates at least sixty per cent of the tobacco bar's total annual gross
163 sales from on-site sales of tobacco products, as determined in an annual
164 audit conducted by an independent certified public accountant; and
165 "tobacco product" means cigars and pipe tobacco, and does not include
166 cannabis, cigarettes or chewing tobacco.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 30-22a(k)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 19a-342(b)
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 19a-342a(b)
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 6 of 6